Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1403
Accredited school of mortuary science, defined.

Accredited school of mortuary science means a school of the same type as those rated Class A by the Conference of Funeral Service Examining Boards of the United States, Inc., approved by the board.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 539.